Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1113
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Special Education Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 79-1114 to 79-1125.01 shall be used.

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 520, § 23;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3303;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 795;

Laws 1997, LB 865, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 37;

Laws 2010, LB1087, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 13.